voikko-fi/vvfst/poikkeavat-sukija.lexc
LEXICON SukijaPoikkeavat_l
[Ll][Xp]aikainen[X]aikai:aikahi  LaatusanaNainenInen_a ;
[Ll][Xp]bolsevistinen[X]bolsevisti:bolshevisti LaatusanaNainenInen_a ;
[Ll][Xp]esimuistoinen[X]esi[Bm]muistoi:esimuistoi  LaatusanaNainenInen_a ;
[Ll][Xp]esivalintainen[X]esi[Bm]valintai:esivalintai  LaatusanaNainenInen_a ;
[Ll][Xp]etäkäyttöinen[X]etä[Bm]käyttöi:etäkäyttöi     LaatusanaNainenInen_ä ;
[Ll][Xp]evolutionaarinen[X]evolutionaari:evolutionääri LaatusanaNainenInen_ä ;
[Ll][Xp]institutionaalinen[X]institutionaali:institutionali LaatusanaNainenInen_a ;
[Ll][Xp]jonkinlainen[X]jonkin[Bm]lai:jonkillai LaatusanaNainenInen_a ;
[Ll][Xp]jonkunlainen[X]jonkun[Bm]lai:jonkullai LaatusanaNainenInen_a ;
[Ll][Xp]jäljelläoleva[X]jäljellä[Bm]olev:jälelläolev LaatusanaAsema_a ;
[Ll][Xp]jäljelläoleva[X]jäljellä[Bm]olev:jäljelläolev LaatusanaAsema_a ;
[Ll][Xp]jäljellejäänyt[X]jäljelle[Bm]jään:jälellejään LaatusanaKuollut_ä;
[Ll][Xp]jäljellejäänyt[X]jäljelle[Bm]jään:jäljellejään LaatusanaKuollut_ä;
[Ll][Xp]jäljellejäävä[X]jäljelle[Bm]jääv:jälellejääv LaatusanaAsema_ä;
[Ll][Xp]jäljellejäävä[X]jäljelle[Bm]jääv:jäljellejääv LaatusanaAsema_ä;
[Ll][Xp]kaksoistiheyksinen[X]kaksois[Bm]tiheyksi:kaksoistiheyksi LaatusanaNainenInen_a ;
[Ll][Xp]kaukokäyttöinen[X]kauko[Bm]käyttöi:kaukokäyttöi     LaatusanaNainenInen_ä ;
[Ll][Xp]keltainen[X]keltai:kelta LaatusanaNainenInen_a ;
[Ll][Xp]kelta=valkoinen[X]kelta[Bm]valkoi:keltavalkoi LaatusanaNainenInen_a ;
[Ll][Xp]kelta=vartinen[X]kelta[Bm]varti:keltavarti LaatusanaNainenInen_a ;
[Ll][Xp]kelta=verinen[X]kelta[Bm]veri:keltaveri LaatusanaNainenInen_ä ;
[Ll][Xp]kielinen[X]kieli@P.YS_EI_JATKOA.ON@@D.YS_ALKANUT@:kieli@P.YS_EI_JATKOA.ON@@D.YS_ALKANUT@ LaatusanaNainenInen_ä ;
[Ll][Xp]kiiru[X]kiiru:kiiru Yliaste_a ;
[Ll][Xp]kiiruinen[X]kiirui:kiiruhui LaatusanaNainenInen_a ;
[Ll][Xp]kiiruinen[X]kiirui:kiirui LaatusanaNainenInen_a ;
[Ll][Xp]kiiruisa[X]kiiruis:kiiruis LaatusanaKoira_a ;
[Ll][Xp]kiirumpi[X]kiiru:kiiru NimiLaatusanaSuurempi_a ;
[Ll][Xp]kiirumpi[X]kiiru:kiiruhu NimiLaatusanaSuurempi_a ;
[Ll][Xp]kiirumpi[X]kiiru:kiiruu NimiLaatusanaSuurempi_a ;
[Ll][Xp]kiirunalainen[X]kiirun[Bm]alai:kiirunalai LaatusanaNainenInen_a ;
[Ll][Xp]kultainen[X]kultai:kullai LaatusanaNainenInen_a ;
[Ll][Xp]minkä=lainen[X]minkä[Bm]lai:minkäläi LaatusanaNainenInen_aä ;
[Ll][Xp]minkään=lainen[X]minkään[Bm]lai:minkäänläi LaatusanaNainenInen_aä ;
[Ll][Xp]muistiin=painuva[X]muistiin[Bm]painuv:muistiinpainuv LaatusanaAsema_a ;
[Ll][Xp]monen=lainen[X]monen[Bm]lai:monellai LaatusanaNainenInen_a ;
[Ll][Xp]neitseellinen[X]neitseelli:neitsyelli LaatusanaNainenInen_ä ;
[Ll][Xp]neitseellinen[X]neitseelli:neitsyeelli LaatusanaNainenInen_ä ;
[Ll][Xp]neitseellinen[X]neitseelli:neitselli LaatusanaNainenInen_ä ;
[Ll][Xp]neitsyinen[X]neitsyi:neitsyi LaatusanaNainenInen_ä ;
[Ll][Xp]oktaaninen[X]oktaani:oktani LaatusanaNainenInen_a ;
[Ll][Xp]oma=kutoinen[X]oma[Bm]kutoi:omakutoi LaatusanaNainenInen_a ;
[Ll][Xp]oma=rahoitteinen[X]oma[Bm]rahoittei:omarahottei LaatusanaNainenInen_a ;
[Ll][Xp]oma=rakenteinen[X]oma[Bm]rakentei:omarakentei LaatusanaNainenInen_a ;
[Ll][Xp]pieni[X]pien:pien LaatusanaSukijaPieni_ä ;
[Ll][Xp]peilityyni[X]peili[Bm]tyyn:peilityyn LaatusanaSukijaPieni_ä ;
[Ll][Xp]perään=antavainen[X]perään[Bm]antavai:peräänantavai LaatusanaNainenInen_a ;
[Ll][Xp]populaarinen[X]populaari:populaari LaatusanaNainenInen_a ;
[Ll][Xp]populaarinen[X]populaari:populääri LaatusanaNainenInen_aä ;
[Ll][Xp]populäärinen[X]populääri:populääri LaatusanaNainenInen_aä ;
[Ll][Xp]populäärinen[X]populääri:populaari LaatusanaNainenInen_aä ;
[Ll][Xp]psykedeelinen[X]psykedeeli:psykedeli LaatusanaNainenInen_ä ;
[Ll][Xp]punainen[X]punai:puna LaatusanaNainenInen_a ;
[Ll][Xp]päälle=tunkevainen[X]päälle[Bm]tunkevai:päälletunkevai LaatusanaNainenInen_a ;
[Ll][Xp]rasvatyyni[X]rasva[Bm]tyyn:rasvatyyn LaatusanaSukijaPieni_ä ;
[Ll][Xp]senkaltainen[X]sen[Bm]kaltai:senkallai LaatusanaNainenInen_a ;
[Ll][Xp]senlainen[X]sen[Bm]lai:senkinlai LaatusanaNainenInen_a ;
[Ll][Xp]sini=kelta=valkoinen[X]sini[Bm]kelta[Bm]valkoi:sinikeltavalkoi LaatusanaNainenInen_a ;
[Ll][Xp]sisäkäyttöinen[X]sisä[Bm]käyttöi:sisäkäyttöi     LaatusanaNainenInen_ä ;
[Ll][Xp]sisäviistoinen[X]sisä[Bm]viistoi:sisäviistoi     LaatusanaNainenInen_a ;
[Ll][Xp]sosiaali=demo=kraattinen[X]sosiaali[Bm]demo[Bm]kraatti:sosialidemokrati LaatusanaNainenInen_a ;
[Ll][Xp]taiteikas[X]taiteik:taitehik LaatusanaVilkas_a ;
[Ll][Xp]taiteikas[X]taiteik:taidehik LaatusanaVilkas_a ;
[Ll][Xp]toisenlainen[X]toisen[Bm]lai:toisellai LaatusanaNainenInen_a ;
[Ll][Xp]tosi=kristillinen[X]tosi[Bm]kristilli:tosikristilli LaatusanaNainenInen_ä ;
[Ll][Xp]tuollainen[X]tuollai:tollai LaatusanaNainenInen_a ;
[Ll][Xp]tuore[X]tuore[Ses][Ny]nna:tuorenna LaatusanaLiOlV_a ;
[Ll][Xp]tyyni[X]tyyn:tyyn LaatusanaSukijaPieni_ä ;
[Ll][Xp]tämän=lainen[X]tämän[Bm]lai:tänlai LaatusanaNainenInen_a ;
[Ll][Xp]urhoollinen[X]urhoolli:urholli LaatusanaNainenInen_a ;
[Ll][Xp]uusi[X]uu[Ses][Ny]nna:uunna LaatusanaLiOlV_a ;
[Ll][Xp]vaivalloinen[X]vaivalloi:vaivaloi LaatusanaNainenInen_a ;
[Ll][Xp]valkoinen[X]valkoi:valko LaatusanaNainenInen_a ;
[Ll][Xp]vetre[X]vetre:vetre LaatusanaHame_ä ;
[Ll][Xp]vetre[X]vetre[Ses][Ny]nnä:vetrennä LaatusanaLiOlV_ä ;
[Ll][Xp]yhdenlainen[X]yhden[Bm]lai:yhdellai LaatusanaNainenInen_a ;
[Ll][Xp]yksi=toikkoinen[X]yksi[Bm]toikkoi:ykstoikkoi LaatusanaNainenInen_a ;
[Ll][Xp]ylitse=vuotavainen[X]ylitse[Bm]vuotavai:ylitsevuotavai LaatusanaNainenInen_a ;
[Ll][Xp]yli=luonnollinen[X]yli[Bm]luonnolli:ylönluonnolli LaatusanaNainenInen_a ;
[Ll][Xp]ylen=palttinen[X]ylen[Bm]paltti:ylönpaltti LaatusanaNainenInen_a ;
[Ll][Xp]ylön=palttinen[X]ylön[Bm]paltti:ylönpaltti LaatusanaNainenInen_a ;
[Ll][Xp]ylös=rakentavainen[X]ylös[Bm]rakentavai:ylösrakentavai LaatusanaNainenInen_a ;

LEXICON SukijaPoikkeavat_nl
[Lnl][Xp]afgaanilainen[X]afgaanilai:afgaanilai NimiLaatusanaNainenInen_a ;
[Lnl][Xp]afgaanilainen[X]afgaanilai:afganilai NimiLaatusanaNainenInen_a ;
[Lnl][Xp]albanialainen[X]albanialai:albaanialai NimiLaatusanaNainenInen_a ;
[Lnl][Xp]bulgarialainen[X]bulgarialai:bulgaarialai NimiLaatusanaNainenInen_a ;
[Lnl][Xp]juoni[X]juon:juon NimiLaatusanaSukijaPieni_a ;
[Lnl][Xp]isonlainen[X]ison[Bm]lai:isollai NimiLaatusanaNainenInen_a ;
[Lnl][Xp]kaikenlainen[X]kaiken[Bm]lai:kaikellai NimiLaatusanaNainenInen_a ;
[Lnl][Xp]läsnäasuvainen[X]läsnä[Bm]asuvai:läsnäasuvai NimiLaatusanaNainenInen_a ;
[Lnl][Xp]läsnäolevainen[X]läsnä[Bm]olevai:läsnäolevai NimiLaatusanaNainenInen_a ;
[Lnl][Xp]mongolilainen[X]mongolilai@P.LAINEN.ON@@C.LAINEN_VAADITTU@@C.VAIN_NIMISANA@:mongoolilai@P.LAINEN.ON@@C.LAINEN_VAADITTU@@C.VAIN_NIMISANA@ NimiLaatusanaNainenInen_a ;
[Lnl][Xp]nuori[X]nuor[Ses][Ny]na:nuorna NimisanaLiOlV_a ;
[Lnl][Xp]nuori[X]nuor[Ses][Ny]ra:nuorra NimisanaLiOlV_a ;
[Lnl][Xp]platonilainen[X]platonilai@P.LAINEN.ON@@C.LAINEN_VAADITTU@@C.VAIN_NIMISANA@:platoonilai@P.LAINEN.ON@@C.LAINEN_VAADITTU@@C.VAIN_NIMISANA@ NimiLaatusanaNainenInen_a ;
[Lnl][Xp]radikaalinen[X]radikaali:radikali NimiLaatusanaNainenInen_a ;
[Lnl][Xp]ranskalainen[X]ranska[Bm]lai:franskalai  NimiLaatusanaNainenInen_a ;
[Lnl][Xp]roomalainen[X]rooma[Bm]lai:romalai      NimiLaatusanaNainenInen_a ;
[Lnl][Xp]saman=lainen[X]saman[Bm]lai:samallai NimiLaatusanaNainenInen_a ;
[Lnl][Xp]saraseenilainen[X]saraseenilai@P.LAINEN.ON@@C.LAINEN_VAADITTU@@C.VAIN_NIMISANA@:saraseniläi@P.LAINEN.ON@@C.LAINEN_VAADITTU@@C.VAIN_NIMISANA@ NimiLaatusanaNainenInen_ä ;
[Lnl][Xp]saraseenilainen[X]saraseenilai@P.LAINEN.ON@@C.LAINEN_VAADITTU@@C.VAIN_NIMISANA@:saraseeniläi@P.LAINEN.ON@@C.LAINEN_VAADITTU@@C.VAIN_NIMISANA@ NimiLaatusanaNainenInen_ä ;
[Lnl][Xp]semmoinen[X]semmoi:semmo LaatusanaNainenInen_a  ;
[Lnl][Xp]semmoinen[X]semmoi:senmoi LaatusanaNainenInen_a  ;
[Lnl][Xp]stationaari[X]stationaar:stationaar NimiLaatusanaRisti_aä ;
[Lnl][Xp]stationaari[X]stationaar:stationäär NimiLaatusanaRisti_aä ;
[Lnl][Xp]stationaarinen[X]stationaari:stationääri NimiLaatusanaNainenInen_aä ;
[Lnl][Xp]suurenmoinen[X]suuren[Bm]moi:suuremmoi NimiLaatusanaNainenInen_a ;
[Lnl][Xp]suuri[X]suur[Ses][Ny]na:suurna NimisanaLiOlV_a ;
[Lnl][Xp]suuri[X]suur[Ses][Ny]ra:suurra NimisanaLiOlV_a ;
[Lnl][Xp]terve[X]terve[Ses][Ny]nnä:tervennä NimisanaLiOlV_ä ;
[Lnl][Xp]teutonilainen[X]teutonilai@P.LAINEN.ON@@C.LAINEN_VAADITTU@@C.VAIN_NIMISANA@:teutoonilai@P.LAINEN.ON@@C.LAINEN_VAADITTU@@C.VAIN_NIMISANA@ NimiLaatusanaNainenInen_a ;
[Lnl][Xp]vallonilainen[X]vallonilai@P.LAINEN.ON@@C.LAINEN_VAADITTU@@C.VAIN_NIMISANA@:valloonilai@P.LAINEN.ON@@C.LAINEN_VAADITTU@@C.VAIN_NIMISANA@ NimiLaatusanaNainenInen_a ;
[Lnl][Xp]vapaa=ehtoinen[X]vapaa[Bm]ehtoi:vapaehtoi NimiLaatusanaNainenInen_a ;
[Lnl][Xp]viktoriaaninen[X]viktoriaani:viktooriaani NimiLaatusanaNainenInen_a ;

LEXICON SukijaPoikkeavat_t
[Lt][Xp]kumoon=heittää[X]kumoon[Bm]heit@P.V_SALLITTU.T@:kumoonheit@P.V_SALLITTU.T@ Heittää_ä ;
[Lt][Xp]kumoon=kaataa[X]kumoon[Bm]kaa:kumoonkaa Huutaa_a ;
[Lt][Xp]kumoon=kaataa[X]kumoon[Bm]kaa:kumoonkaa Raataa_a ;
[Lt][Xp]kumoon=kaatua[X]kumoon[Bm]kaa:kumoonkaa Kaatua_a ;
[Lt][Xp]kumoon=keikahtaa[X]kumoon[Bm]keika:kumoonkeika Hujahtaa_a ;
[Lt][Xp]kumoon=kääntää[X]kumoon[Bm]kään:kumoonkään Alentaa_ä ;
[Lt][Xp]kumoon=mennä[X]kumoon[Bm]men:kumoonmen Mennä_ä ;
[Lt][Xp]kumoon=paiskata[X]kumoon[Bm]paisk:kumoonpaisk Salata_a ;
[Lt][Xp]kumoon=puhua[X]kumoon[Bm]puhu:kumoonpuhu Punoa_a ;
[Lt][Xp]kumoon=purjehtia[X]kumoon[Bm]purjeh:kumoonpurjeh Laatia_a ;
[Lt][Xp]kumoon=ratsastaa[X]kumoon[Bm]ratsast:kumoonratsast Aavistaa_a ;
[Lt][Xp]kumoon=suistaa[X]kumoon[Bm]suist@P.V_SALLITTU.T@:kumoonsuist@P.V_SALLITTU.T@ Muistaa_a ;
[Lt][Xp]kumoon=viskata[X]kumoon[Bm]visk:kumoonvisk Salata_a ;
[Lt][Xp]olla[X]lien:lien Ehtotapa_ä ;
[Lt][Xp]tuta[X]tu:tu SukijaTuta ;
[Lt][Xp]mennä[X]mee:mee SukijaMennä_ä ;
[Lt][Xp]tulla[X]tuu:tuu SukijaTulla_a ;
[Lt][Xp]kitistä[X]kit:kit Kihajaa_a ;
[Lt][Xp]lätistä[X]lät:lät Kihajaa_ä ;
[Lt][Xp]nitistä[X]nit:nit Kihajaa_a ;
[Lt][Xp]pakista[X]pak:pak Kihajaa_a ;
[Lt][Xp]pamista[X]pam:pam Kihajaa_a ;
[Lt][Xp]ratista[X]rat:rat Kihajaa_a ;
[Lt][Xp]ritistä[X]rit:rit Kihajaa_a ;
[Lt][Xp]vapista[X]vap:vap Kihajaa_a ;
[Lt][Xp]perkata[X]perk:perk Taata_a ;
[Lt][Xp]muistiin=kirjata[X]muistiin[Bm]kirj:muistiinkirj Salata_a ;
[Lt][Xp]muistiin=lukea[X]muistiin[Bm]lu:muistiinlu Hakea_a ;
[Lt][Xp]muistiin=palauttaa[X]muistiin[Bm]palaut:muistiinpalaut Alittaa_a ;
[Lt][Xp]puoleta[X]puole:puole Aleta_a ;
[Lt][Xp]evakuoida[X]evakuo:evako Kanavoida_a ;
[Lt][Xp]himottaa[X]himo@P.YKSITEKIJÄINEN.ON@:himoi@P.YKSITEKIJÄINEN.ON@ Ammottaa_a ;
[Lt][Xp]huojeta[X]huoke:huoke Aleta_s_a ;
[Lt][Xp]hyljätä[X]hylj:hylj Salata_ä ;
[Lt][Xp]kurtiseerata[X]kurtiseer:kurttiseer Saneerata_a ;
[Lt][Xp]odottaa[X]odot:oot Alittaa_a ;
[Lt][Xp]pudottaa[X]pudo:puo Ammottaa_a ;
[Lt][Xp]vavista[X]vavis:vavis Nuolaista_s_a ;
[Lt][Xp]enätä[X]enä:enä Aleta_ä ;
[Lt][Xp]käätä[X]kää:kää Aleta_ä ;
[Lt][Xp]löytä[X]löy:löy Aleta_ä ;
[Lt][Xp]ojeta[X]oje:ojee Aleta_a ;
[Lt][Xp]raketa[X]rake:rake Aleta_a ;
[Lt][Xp]rietä[X]rie:rie Aleta_ä ;
[Lt][Xp]väätä[X]vää:vää Aleta_ä ;
